Oklahoma, session 2026, SB380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2101, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 2101. A. Every The state and any county, municipality,

city, town, school or any other political subdivision is authorized

to display, in its public buildings and on its grounds, replicas of

historical documents including, but not limited to, the Ten

Commandments, Magna Carta, Mayflower Compact, Declaration of

Independence, United States Constitution, Bill of Rights, Oklahoma

Constitution and other historically significant documents in the

Req. No. 464 Page 1

form of statues, monuments, memorials, tablets or any other display

that respects the dignity and solemnity of such documents. Such

documents shall be displayed in a manner consistent with the context

of other documents contained in such display.

B. A monument of the Ten Commandments shall be prominently

displayed and protected on the inside and outside of the Oklahoma

State Capitol as a symbol of its historic significance for Oklahoman

and American history. The Governor, the President Pro Tempore of

the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall

meet within one (1) year after the effective date of this act to

determine the design, placement, security, construction, and funding

of the monuments. Such officials may consult with third-party

groups to assist in making such determinations and with the

implementation of such determinations. Only donated funds may be

used for the design, placement, security, and construction of the

monuments. Monuments shall not be relocated once they are in place

without approval by three-fourths (3/4) of both houses of the

Legislature and approval of the Governor. Any person who knowingly

causes damage or destruction to the monuments shall be, upon

conviction, guilty of a felony.

C. In the event that the legality or constitutionality of any

such display is challenged in a court of law, the Oklahoma Attorney

General is authorized to prepare and present a legal defense of the

display.

Req. No. 464 Page 2

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-464 TEK 1/14/2025 3:50:46 PM





































Req. No. 464 Page 3